Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201448-139
Compensation;
lump-sum settlement; submitted to Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court; procedure; filing
of release; form; contents; payment; fees.

(1)(a) Whenever an injured employee or his or her dependents
and the employer agree that the amounts of compensation due as periodic payments
for death, permanent disability, or claimed permanent disability under the
Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act shall be commuted to one or more lump-sum
payments, such settlement shall be submitted to the Nebraska Workers' Compensation
Court for approval as provided in subsection (2) of this section if:

(i) The employee is not represented by counsel;

(ii) The employee, at the time the settlement is executed,
is eligible for medicare, is a medicare beneficiary, or has a reasonable expectation
of becoming eligible for medicare within thirty months after the date the
settlement is executed;

(iii) Medical, surgical, or hospital expenses incurred for
treatment of the injury have been paid by medicaid and medicaid will not be
reimbursed as part of the settlement;

(iv) Medical, surgical, or hospital expenses incurred for
treatment of the injury will not be fully paid as part of the settlement;
or

(v) The settlement seeks to commute amounts of compensation
due to dependents of the employee.

(b) If such lump-sum settlement is not required to be submitted
for approval by the compensation court, a release shall be filed with the
compensation court as provided in subsection (3) of this section. Nothing
in this section shall be construed to increase the compensation court's duties
or authority with respect to the approval of lump-sum settlements under the
act.

(2)(a) An application for an order approving a lump-sum settlement,
signed and verified by both parties, shall be filed with the clerk of the
compensation court and shall be entitled the same as an action by such employee
or dependents against such employer. The application shall contain a concise
statement of the terms of the settlement or agreement sought to be approved
with a brief statement of the facts concerning the injury, the nature thereof,
the wages received by the injured employee prior thereto, the nature of the
employment, and such other matters as may be required by the compensation
court. The application may provide for payment of future medical, surgical,
or hospital expenses incurred by the employee. The compensation court may
hold a hearing on the application at a time and place selected by the compensation
court, and proof may be adduced and witnesses subpoenaed and examined the
same as in an action in equity.

(b) If the compensation court finds such lump-sum settlement
is made in conformity with the compensation schedule and for the best interests
of the employee or his or her dependents under all the circumstances, the
compensation court shall make an order approving the same. If such settlement
is not approved, the compensation court may dismiss the application at the
cost of the employer or continue the hearing, in the discretion of the compensation
court.

(c) Every such lump-sum settlement approved by order of the
compensation court shall be final and conclusive unless procured by fraud.
Upon paying the amount approved by the compensation court, the employer (i)
shall be discharged from further liability on account of the injury or death,
other than liability for the payment of future medical, surgical, or hospital
expenses if such liability is approved by the compensation court on the application
of the parties, and (ii) shall be entitled to a duly executed release. Upon
filing the release, the liability of the employer under any agreement, award,
finding, or decree shall be discharged of record.

(3) If such lump-sum settlement is not required to be submitted
for approval by the compensation court, a release shall be filed with the
compensation court in accordance with this subsection that is signed and verified
by the employee and the employee's attorney. The release shall be made on a form
approved by the compensation court and shall contain a statement signed and
verified by the employee that:

(a) The employee understands and waives all rights under the
Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act, including, but not limited to:

(i) The right to receive weekly disability benefits, both
temporary and permanent;

(ii) The right to receive vocational rehabilitation services;

(iii) The right to receive future medical, surgical, and hospital
services as provided in section 48-120, unless such services are specifically
excluded from the release; and

(iv) The right to ask a judge of the compensation court to
decide the parties' rights and obligations;

(b) The employee is not eligible for medicare, is not a current
medicare beneficiary, and does not have a reasonable expectation of becoming
eligible for medicare within thirty months after the date the settlement is
executed;

(c) There are no medical, surgical, or hospital expenses incurred
for treatment of the injury which have been paid by medicaid and not reimbursed
to medicaid by the employer as part of the settlement; and

(d) There are no medical, surgical, or hospital expenses incurred
for treatment of the injury that will remain unpaid after the settlement.

(4) A release
filed with the compensation court in accordance with subsection (3) of this
section shall be final and conclusive as to all rights waived in the release
unless procured by fraud. Amounts to be paid by the employer to the employee
pursuant to such release shall be paid within thirty days of filing the release
with the compensation court. Fifty percent shall be added for payments owed
to the employee if made after thirty days after the date the release is filed
with the compensation court. Upon making payment owed by the employer as set
forth in the release, such release shall be a full and complete discharge
from further liability for the employer on account of the injury, including
future medical, surgical, or hospital expenses, unless such expenses are specifically
excluded from the release, and the court shall enter an order of dismissal
with prejudice as to all rights waived in the release.

(5) The fees of the clerk
of the compensation court for filing, docketing, and indexing an application
for an order approving a lump-sum settlement or filing a release as provided
in this section shall be fifteen dollars. The fees shall be remitted by the
clerk to the State Treasurer for credit to the Compensation Court Cash Fund.

Laws 1917, c. 85, § 16, p. 212;

Laws 1921, c. 122, § 1, p. 526;

C.S.1922, § 3063;

C.S.1929, § 48-140;

Laws 1935, c. 57, § 25, p. 199;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 48-140;

R.S.1943, § 48-139;

Laws 1951, c. 153, § 1, p. 623;

Laws 1975, LB 187, § 4;

Laws 1977, LB 126, § 3;

Laws 1978, LB 649, § 3;

Laws 1986, LB 811, § 57;

Laws 1993, LB 757, § 10;

Laws 2002, LB 417, § 3;

Laws 2009, LB630, § 6;

Laws 2014, LB961, § 11.
July 18, 2014
Where lump sum settlement is made and later application is made for further compensation for disability claimed not covered by settlement, burden of proof is on employee. Gooch Milling & Elevator Co. v. Warner, 127 Neb. 796, 257 N.W. 224 (1934).

Where approved lump sum settlement, accepted by employee before death, was complete compensation, widow was not entitled to further award. Lincoln Packing Co. v. Coe, 120 Neb. 299, 232 N.W. 92 (1930).

Final power to award lump sum settlement for employee's death or permanent disability rests with district court, subject to review. Jackson v. Ford Motor Co., 115 Neb. 758, 214 N.W. 631 (1927).

In the approval of commutation of compensation, the public has an interest which it is the duty of the court to protect without regard to the wishes of the parties. Perry v. Huffman Auto. Co., 104 Neb. 211, 175 N.W. 1021 (1920).

Lump sum settlements are authorized only in sound discretion of district court. Myers v. Armour & Co., 103 Neb. 407, 172 N.W. 45 (1919).

Commutation cannot be ordered except with consent of both parties, but court must ratify. Pierce v. Boyer-Van Kuran Lumber & Coal Co., 99 Neb. 321, 156 N.W. 509 (1916); Bailey v. United States Fidelity & Guaranty Co., 99 Neb. 109, 155 N.W. 237 (1915).

In order to achieve a modification of a lump-sum payment that has been approved by court order pursuant to this section on the ground of increased or decreased incapacity, a party must make an application on the ground of increase or decrease of incapacity due solely to the injury. Hubbart v. Hormel Foods Corp., 15 Neb. App. 129, 723 N.W.2d 350 (2006).

Lump-sum settlements in workers' compensation actions cannot be modified in the future or be considered when determining future workers' compensation awards, because such awards are "final." Dukes v. University of Nebraska, 12 Neb. App. 539, 679 N.W.2d 249 (2004).